Tennessee, session 114, HB2072.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-7-105(a), is amended by deleting
the language "one-half (1/2) hour" and substituting "one (1) hour".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2072
011856
- 1 -